Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 6

Delivery of Articles

48-248-601. Delivery of articles to licensing authority.

A domestic or foreign PLLC may not render professional services in this state until it delivers a certified copy of its articles (or equivalent) and, if a foreign PLLC, a certified copy of its certificate of authority to transact business in this state to each licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional service described in the articles.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-602. Annual statement.

If required by a rule promulgated by the licensing authority having authority over professional services rendered by employees and/or members of the PLLC, each domestic PLLC, and each foreign PLLC registered in this state, shall deliver for filing to each licensing authority having jurisdiction over a professional service described in the PLLC's articles an annual statement of qualification setting forth:

The names and usual business addresses of its members, managers and governors (or their equivalent), if any; and

Information required by rule promulgated by the licensing authority to determine compliance with this chapter and other rules promulgated under it.

The first qualification statement required under this section must be delivered to the licensing authority between January 1 and April 1 of the year following the adoption of a rule requiring such statements and the calendar year in which a domestic LLC became a PLLC, or a foreign PLLC was authorized to transact business in this state. Subsequent qualification statements must be delivered to the licensing authority between January 1 and April 1 of the following calendar years.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-603. Rules.

Each licensing authority is empowered to promulgate rules expressly authorized by this chapter if the rules are consistent with the public interest or required by the public health or welfare or by generally recognized standards of professional conduct.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-604. Jurisdiction of licensing authority.

This chapter does not restrict the jurisdiction of a licensing authority over individuals rendering a professional service within the jurisdiction of the licensing authority, nor does it affect the interpretation or application of any law pertaining to standards of professional conduct except, notwithstanding any other provision of chapters 201-248 of this title, this chapter expressly provides that persons engaged in a professional service are expressly authorized to form a PLLC in which to conduct their business and limit their liability for the acts of others.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-605. Amendment of existing laws and right to practice profession in other forms.

Notwithstanding any other provision of chapters 201-248 of this title, the laws of this state relating to the regulation of professional services are hereby amended and superseded to the extent such laws are inconsistent as to form of organization with the provision of chapters 201-248 of this title, and are deemed amended to permit the provision of professional services within this state by PLLCs. This chapter does not affect an existing or future right or privilege to render professional services through the use of any other form of business entity.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-248-606. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time and all domestic and foreign professional limited liability companies subject to this chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.